Hawaii statutes.
§150A-23 Nursery stock certificate.
The department may issue and authorize the use of nursery stock certificates by
any shipper complying with its regulation for nursery inspection. Shipments
accompanied by these certificates may move to other localities within the
county or to other counties without inspection at destination. Nursery stock
certificates may be issued for interstate shipments. Fees may be charged for
nursery certification and shall be deposited into the pest inspection,
quarantine, and eradication fund. Nursery stock certificates shall not be
altered or misused.

The department may revoke or suspend the right
to use any nursery stock certificate which is issued to any person who fails to
comply with requirements for use of the certificate. [L 1977, c 114, pt of §4;
am L 2010, c 173, §7]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next